Washington statutes.
RCW 34.08.010

Legislative finding.

The legislature finds that a need exists to adequately inform the public on the conduct of the people's business by state government, and that providing adequate notice of the affairs of government enables the public to actively participate in the conduct of state government. The legislature further finds that the promulgation of rules by state agencies has a direct effect on the ability of the people to conduct their personal affairs and knowledgeably deal with state government. It is therefore the intent and purpose of RCW 1.08.110 and 42.30.075 and of this chapter to require the publication of a state register by which the public will be adequately informed of the activities of government and where they may actively participate in the conduct of state government and influence the decision making process of the people's business.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 240 s 1.]